Maryland, session 2025, SB0760.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0760*

SENATE BILL 760
15–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) (1) “Health benefit plan” means:
(i) a policy or certificate for hospital or medical benefits issued by
an insurer;
(ii) a nonprofit health service plan contract; or
(iii) a health maintenance organization subscriber or group master
contract.
(2) “Health benefit plan” includes a policy or certificate for hospital or
medical benefits that covers residents of this State who are eligible employees and that is
issued through[:
(i)] a multiple employer trust or association located in this State or
another state[; or
(ii) a professional employer organization, coemployer, or other
organization located in this State or another state that engages in employee leasing].
(R–1) (1) “PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYER ORGANIZATION” MEANS A BUSINESS
ENTITY THAT ENTERS INTO A CONTRACTUAL AGREEMENT WITH ANOTHER BUSINESS
ENTITY UNDER WHICH EMPLOYER RESPONSIBILITIES ARE ALLOCATED BETWEEN
THE BUSINESS ENTITIES FOR ALL OR AT LEAST HALF OF THE WORKSITE EMPLOYEES
OF THE SECOND BUSINESS ENTITY.
(2) “PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYER ORGANIZATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE
A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:
(I) RECRUITS AND HIRES ITS OWN EMPLOYEES;
(II) FINDS OTHER ORGANIZATIONS THAT NEED THE SERVICES
OF ITS EMPLOYEES;
(III) ASSIGNS EMPLOYEES TO CLIENTS ON A TEMPORARY BASIS
TO SUPPORT OR SUPPLEMENT THE CLIENT’S WORKFORCE IN SPECIAL
CIRCUMSTANCES SUCH AS EMPLOYEE ABSENCES, TEMPORARY SKILL SHORTAGES,
AND SEASONAL WORKLOADS; AND

SENATE BILL 760 3
(IV) CUSTOMARILY ATTEMPTS TO REASSIGN THE EMPLOYEES TO
OTHER CLIENTS WHEN THE EMPLOYEES FINISH EACH ASSIGNMENT.
15–1202.
(b) This subtitle applies to any health benefit plan offered by an association, [a
professional employer organization, or any other entity,] including a plan issued under the
laws of another state, if the health benefit plan covers eligible employees of one or more
small employers and meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
15–1204.1.
(a) (1) This section applies to a carrier with respect to any health benefit plan
that:
[(1)] (I) is not a grandfathered health plan, as defined in § 1251 of the
Affordable Care Act; and
[(2)] (II) is issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or after January
1, 2014.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY WITH RESPECT TO A HEALTH
BENEFIT PLAN ISSUED THROUGH A PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYER ORGANIZATION.
(b) (1) Except as provided in this subsection and § 31–110(f) of this article, a
carrier may not offer health benefit plans to small employers in the State unless the carrier
also offers qualified health plans, as defined in § 31–101 of this article, in the Small
Business Health Options Program of the Maryland Health Benefit Exchange in compliance
with the requirements of Title 31 of this article.
(2) A carrier is exempt from the requirement in paragraph (1) of this
subsection if:
(i) the reported total aggregate annual earned premium from all
health benefit plans offered to small employers in the State for the carrier and any other
carriers in the same insurance holding company system, as defined in § 7–101 of this
article, is less than $20,000,000;
(ii) the Commissioner determines that the carrier complies with the
procedures established under paragraph (3) of this subsection; and
(iii) when the carrier ceases to meet the requirements for the
exemption, the carrier provides to the Commissioner immediate notice and its plan for
complying with the requirement in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

SENATE BILL 760
(3) The Commissioner shall establish procedures for a carrier to submit
evidence each year that the carrier meets the requirements necessary to qualify for an
exemption under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(4) Notwithstanding the exemption provided in paragraph (2) of this
subsection, the Commissioner, in consultation with the Maryland Health Benefit
Exchange:
(i) may assess the impact of the exemption provided in paragraph
(2) of this subsection and, based on that assessment, alter the limit on the amount of annual
premiums that may not be exceeded to qualify for the exemption; and
(ii) shall make any change in the exemption requirement by
regulation.
31–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(aa) (1) “Small employer” means an employer that, during the preceding
calendar year, employed an average of not more than 50 employees.
(2) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) all persons treated as a single employer under § 414(b), (c), or (o)
of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated as a single employer;
(ii) an employer and any predecessor employer shall be treated as a
single employer;
(iii) the number of employees of an employer shall be determined by
adding:
1. the number of full–time employees; and
2. the number of full–time equivalent employees, which shall
be calculated for a particular month by dividing the aggregate number of hours of service
of employees who are not full–time employees for the month by 120;
(iv) if an employer was not in existence throughout the preceding
calendar year, the determination of whether the employer is a small employer shall be
based on the average number of employees that the employer is reasonably expected to
employ on business days in the current calendar year;
(v) an employer that makes enrollment in qualified health plans
available to its employees through the SHOP Exchange, and would cease to be a small
employer by reason of an increase in the number of its employees, shall continue to be

SENATE BILL 760 5
treated as a small employer for purposes of this subtitle as long as it continuously makes
enrollment through the SHOP Exchange available to its employees; and
(vi) [to the extent permitted by federal law, an entity that leases
employees from a professional employer organization, coemployer, or other organization
engaged in employee leasing and that otherwise meets the description in this section shall
be treated as a small employer] A WELFARE BENEFIT PLAN OFFERED TO A WORKSITE
EMPLOYEE OF A PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYER ORGANIZATION SHALL BE TREATED AS
A SINGLE EMPLOYER WELFARE BENEFIT PLAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.